Hawaii, session 2026, SB3210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that proton therapy is a type of radiotherapy cancer treatment that delivers high doses of radiation directly to a tumor, sparing nearby healthy tissue.  According to the Mayo Clinic, this pinpoint accuracy makes proton therapy more suitable for treating pediatric cancers than conventional x-ray-based radiation, as precise delivery reduces the risk of long-term side-effects, like hormone depletion and infertility.  A 2025 study from MD Anderson Cancer Center also confirmed similar advantages over conventional radiation with adult cancer patients, conclusively reporting higher standards of life and a higher survival rate for patients treated with proton therapy. The legislature further finds that twenty-three other states and the District of Columbia have purchased and maintained proton therapy machines for the benefit of their residents.  University of Pennsylvania's Roberts Proton Therapy Center in Philadelphia is one of the leading centers in the United States, treating numerous patients each day with proton therapy. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to offer proton therapy for all residents of the State by appropriating funds for the university of Hawaiʻi at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine to purchase a single-room proton therapy system or to contract with a third party or third parties in the private sector to purchase and operate a single-room proton therapy system. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $50,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purchase and installation of a single-room proton therapy system at the university of Hawaiʻi at Manoa John A. Burns School of Medicine or at the location of a contracted third party in the private sector; provided that the proton therapy system shall be available to all residents of the State. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaiʻi for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________